Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-143
Violations; penalty.

Any person or place of public accommodation who or which shall willfully resist, prevent, impede, or interfere with the commission or any of its members or representatives in the performance of duty under sections 20-132 to 20-143, or shall willfully violate an order of the commission shall, upon conviction thereof, be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than thirty days, or be fined not more than one hundred dollars, or be both so fined and imprisoned. Procedure for the review of an order of the commission shall not be deemed to be such willful conduct.

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 12.